Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1288.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 1529. Foreign Language.--(a) Beginning with the 2026-2027 school year, the Department of Education shall develop a toolkit and curriculum guidelines for instruction on foreign languages for all public school students.(b) Each school district shall create a foreign language curriculum for grades kindergarten through twelve utilizing the foreign language toolkit and curriculum guidelines developed by the Department of Education under subsection (a) and may choose 12345678910111213141516171819 the foreign language that relates most to the demographics of the district for the curriculum.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1288PN1469 - 2 - 123